sl-SI: Priloženi kuhinjski pripomočki: Odpirač za steklenice; Odpirač za pločevinke; Zajemalka; Strežnik za testenine; Lupilec; Žlica z režami; Servirna žlica; Spatula; Klešče; Metlica; Drugo
pt-BR: Utensílios de cozinha incluídos: Abridor de garrafa; Abridor de lata; Concha; Colher para servir macarrão; Descascador; Escumadeira; Colher sólida; Espátula; Pinças; Batedeira; Outro
tr: Mutfak gereci öğeleri dahil: Açacak; Konserve açacağı; Kepçe; Makarna servis kaşığı; Kabuk soyucu; Delikli kaşık; Katı kaşığı; Spatula; Maşalar; Çırpıcı; Diğer
da: Køkkenredskaber medfølger: Oplukker; Dåseåbner; Slev; Pastaservering; Skræller; Hulske; Solid ske; Spatel; Køkkentænger; Pisk; Andet
pt-PT: Itens de utensílios de cozinha incluídos: Abre-garrafas; Abre-latas; Concha de servir; Servidor de massa; Descascador; Escumadeira; Colher sólida; Espátula; Tenazes; Batedor; Outro
zh-TW: 包括廚房用具: 開瓶器; 開罐器; 湯杓; 義大利麵勺; 削皮器; 漏勺; 勺子; 抹刀; 夾子; 攪拌器; 其他
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys virtuvės reikmenys: Butelių atidarytuvas; Skardinių atidarytuvas; Samtis; Makaronų samtis; Skustukas; Kiaurasamtis; Šaukštas; Mentelė; Žnyplės; Šluotelė; Kita
hu: A tartalmazott konyhai eszközök: Palacknyitó; Konzervnyitó; Merőkanál; Tésztaszedő; Hámozó; Szűrőkanál; Tömör kanál; Spatula; Csipesz; Habverő; Egyéb
hr-HR: Uključeni komadi kuhinjskog pribora: Otvarač za boce; Otvarač za limenke; Kutlača; Žlica za tjesteninu; Ljuštilica; Perforirana žlica; Čvrsta žlica; Lopatica; Hvataljke; Pjenjača; Ostalo
ja: キッチン用品の付属アイテム: 栓抜き; 缶切り; お玉; パスタサーバー; ピーラー; 穴あきおたま; ソリッドスプーン; スパチュラ; トング; 泡立て器; その他
fi: Mukana keittiövälineet: Pullonavaaja; Tölkinavaaja; Kauha; Pastakauha; Kuorimaveitsi; Reikäkauha; Kiinteä lusikka; Spatula; Keittiöpihdit; Vispilä; Muu
zh-CN: 包括厨房用具: 开瓶器; 开罐器; 长柄杓; 捞面勺; 削皮器; 篦式漏勺; 实心勺; 抹刀; 钳; 打蛋器; 其他
pl: W zestawie przybory kuchenne: Otwieracz do butelek; Otwieracz do konserw; Chochla; Serwetka do makaronu; Przyrząd do usuwania podkładu; Łyżka z rowkiem; Solidna łyżka; Szpatułka; Szczypce; Trzepaczka; Inne
nb: Kjøkkenutstyr inkludert: Flaskeåpnere; Boksåpner; Øse; Pastaskje; Skreller; Skjeer med slisser; Solid skje; Stekespade; Klyper; Visp; Annet
ko: 주방용품 포함: 병따개; 통조림 따개; 국자; 파스타 서버; 필러; 슬롯 스푼; 솔리드 스푼; 스파츌라; 집게; 거품기; 기타
sv: Köksredskap ingår: Flasköppnare; Konservöppnare; Slev; Pastaserverare; Skalare; Hålslev; Hel sked; Spatel; Kökstänger; Visp; Övrigt
bg-BG: Включени кухненски прибори: Отварачка за бутилки; Отварачка за консерви; Черпак; Лъжица за паста; Белачка; Решетъчна лъжица; Твърда лъжица; Шпатула; Щипки; Бъркалка; Други
ru: Состав набора кухонной утвари: Открывашка для бутылок; Консервный нож; Половник; Ложка для спагетти; Овощечистка; Шумовка; Большая ложка; Лопатка; Щипцы; Венчик; Другое
ro-RO: Ustensile de bucătărie incluse: Deschizător de sticle; Deschizător de conserve; Polonic; Polonic pentru paste; Cuțit de decojit; Lingură cu găuri; Lingură solidă; Spatulă; Clești; Tel; Altele
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη κουζίνας: Ανοιχτήρι μπουκαλιών; Ανοιχτήρι κονσερβών; Κουτάλα; Εργαλείο σερβιρίσματος ζυμαρικών; Αποφλοιωτής; Τρυπητή κουτάλα; Συμπαγές κουτάλι; Σπάτουλα; Λαβίδες; Σύρμα; Άλλο
th: อุปกรณ์เครื่องครัวที่รวมอยู่: ที่เปิดขวด; ที่เปิดกระป๋อง; กระบวย; ที่คีบพาสต้า; เครื่องปอก; ทัพพีมีรู; ทัพพี; ไม้พาย; ที่คีบ; ที่ตี; อื่นๆ
es: Artículos de utensilios de cocina incluidos: Abrebotellas; Abrelatas; Cucharón; Servidor de pasta; Pelador; Cuchara ranurada; Cuchara lisa; Espátula; Tenazas; Batidor; Otros
en: Kitchen utensil items included: Bottle opener; Can opener; Ladle; Pasta server; Peeler; Slotted spoon; Solid spoon; Spatula; Tongs; Whisk; Other
vi: Đã bao gồm các vật dụng nhà bếp: Dụng cụ khui nắp chai; Đồ khui hộp; Muôi; Dụng cụ vớt mì ống; Dụng cụ gọt vỏ; Muôi thủng; Muôi kín; Thìa vét bột; Kẹp gắp thức ăn; Cái đánh trứng; Khác
fr: Ustensiles de cuisine inclus: Décapsuleur; Ouvre-boîte; Louche; Serveur de pâtes; Éplucheur; Cuillère à rainures; Cuillère solide; Spatule; Pinces de cuisine; Fouet; Autre
it: Utensili da cucina inclusi: Apribottiglie; Apriscatole; Mestolo; Mestolo per pasta; Pelapatate; Schiumarola; Cucchiaio da minestra; Spatola; Pinze da cucina; Frusta; Altro
nl: Keukengerei inbegrepen: Flesopener; Blikopener; Juslepel; Pastaschep; Schiller; Schuimspaan; Stevige lepel; Spatel; Tangen; Klopper; Andere
sk-SK: Kuchynský riad zahrnutý v cene: Otvárač na fľaše; Otvárač na konzervy; Naberačka; Naberačka na cestoviny; Škrabka; Dierovaná lyžica; Servírovacia lyžica; Špachtľa; Kliešte; Metlička; Iné
de: Inbegriffene Küchenutensilien: Flaschenöffner; Dosenöffner; Kelle; Nudelzange; Schäler; Schaumlöffel; Stabiler Löffel; Spachtel; Zange; Schneebesen; Sonstiges
cs: Obsažené kuchyňské náčiní: Otvírák na láhve; Otvírák na konzervy; Naběračka; Naběračka na těstoviny; Škrabka; Odkapávací lžíce; Velká lžíce; Špachtle; Kleště na vaření; Whisk; Jiné